Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
CHAPTER 5 Drug Abuse Treatment and Education Programs

Cross references.

Hospitalization and treatment of alcoholics, drug dependent individuals, and drug abusers,
T. 37, C. 7.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Drug Abuse Treatment and Education Programs, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Resources, Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities and Addictive Diseases, Chapter 290-4-2.

Law reviews.

For comment, “Solving the Problem of Prenatal Substance Abuse:
An Analysis of Punitive and Rehabilitative Approaches,” see 39 Emory L.J. 1401 (1990).